Illinois, session 104th, SB832.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Substance Use Disorder Act is amended by 5changing Section 1-1 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 301/1-1)7    Sec. 1-1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Substance Use Disorder Act.9(Source: P.A. 100-759, eff. 1-1-19.)